North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116. Higher Education.
Article 31. Piedmont Triad Research Institute and Graduate Engineering Program.

§ 116-250.
Piedmont Triad Regional Institute; establishment; board of directors; purpose.

There is established the Piedmont Triad Research Institute as a nonprofit corporation registered and regulated pursuant to Chapter 55A of the General Statutes.

The Articles of Incorporation of the Institute shall constitute the board of directors of the Institute of individuals representing industrial and business interests in the Triad area, and of representatives of the following universities:

North Carolina Agricultural and Technical State University;

North Carolina State University at Raleigh;

Wake Forest University; and

Winston-Salem State University.

The Institute is established to further education and research in engineering, particularly as engineering may be applied to medicine.

History.

1991, c. 316, s. 1.

§ 116-251.
Piedmont Triad Regional Institute’s Director; funding administration duties.

The Director of the Piedmont Triad Research Institute shall report directly to the board of directors of the Institute. The Director shall administer the Institute’s funds from three primary sources for the general operation of the Institute and the fourth for the operation of the Piedmont Triad Graduate Engineering Program established by

G.S. 116-252

. These sources of funds are as follows:

Funds from external research funding agencies such as the National Science Foundation and the National Institutes of Health;

Funds from industries in support of specific research projects;

Funds from block grants from foundations and chambers of commerce; and

Funds appropriated to the Institute from the State in support of the Piedmont Triad Graduate Engineering Program established by

G.S. 116-252

.

History.

1991, c. 316, s. 1.

§ 116-252.
Piedmont Triad Graduate Engineering Program; establishment; purpose.

There is established the Piedmont Triad Graduate Engineering Program, to be housed in Winston-Salem in facilities provided by the Bowman Gray School of Medicine at Wake Forest University. The program shall support faculty and graduate students involved in engineering at the campuses of The University of North Carolina in order to allow their participation in engineering teaching and research in the Program, which shall provide much-needed university-level engineering education to the Piedmont Triad area.

The Program shall begin to be phased in effective for the academic year 1991-92.

History.

1991, c. 316, s. 1.

§ 116-253.
Piedmont Triad Graduate Engineering Program; Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina; adoption of rules.

The Board of Governors, pursuant to its authority under

G.S. 116-11

, shall adopt rules, after consultation with the board of directors of the Piedmont Triad Research Institute, to implement this Article as it affects the ongoing roles of The University of North Carolina and its designated constituent institutions in the Piedmont Triad Graduate Engineering Program and in the education and research projects of the Institute.

History.

1991, c. 316, s. 1.

§ 116-254 .
[Reserved]

Reserved for future codification purposes.